Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 4
BONDS - REFUNDING

Cross references:

For the "Public Securities Refunding Act", see article 56 of title 11.

30-26-401. Refunding bonds authorized.

The board of county commissioners of any county in this state may issue negotiable coupon bonds, to be denominated refunding bonds, for the purpose of refunding any of the bonded indebtedness of such county, whether due or not due, or which may become payable at the option of such county, or by consent of the bondholders, or by any lawful means, whether such bonded indebtedness existed on March 30, 1917, or was thereafter created, and there are not funds in the treasury of such county available for the payment or redemption of such bonds; but the amount of such refunding bonds to be issued under the provisions of this part 4 shall first be determined by such board of county commissioners, and a certificate of such determination shall be made and entered in the records of the county prior to the issuance of said refunding bonds.

Source:

L. 17:

p. 154, § 1.

C.L.

§ 8865.

CSA:

C. 45, § 217.

CRS 53:

§ 36-7-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-7-1.

30-26-402. Issuance - no election.

Whenever such board of county commissioners deems it expedient to issue refunding bonds under the provisions of this part 4, such refunding bonds may be issued without the submission of the question of issuing such refunding bonds to a vote of the registered qualified electors of such county.

Source:

L. 17:

p. 154, § 2.

C.L.

§ 8866.

CSA:

C. 45, § 218.

CRS 53:

§ 36-7-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-7-2.

L. 70:

p. 139, § 6.

30-26-403. Resolution for issue - form of bonds - coupons - term.

If the board of county commissioners determines to issue refunding bonds, such board shall thereupon adopt a resolution which shall not be subject to the referendum provisions of any statute providing for the issue of said refunding bonds in accordance with the provisions of this part 4. Such resolution shall fix the date of said refunding bonds, shall designate the denomination thereof, the rate of interest, the maturity date, which shall not be more than twenty-five years from the date of said refunding bonds, and the place of payment, within or without the state of Colorado, of both principal and interest, and shall prescribe the form of said refunding bonds.

Such refunding bonds shall be negotiable in form, shall recite the title of the act under which they are issued, shall be executed in the name of the county and signed by the chairman of the board of county commissioners and countersigned by the county treasurer, with the seal of the county affixed thereto and attested by the county clerk and recorder. The interest accruing on such refunding bonds shall be evidenced by semiannual interest coupons thereto attached, bearing the engraved facsimile signature of the county treasurer, and when so executed such coupons shall be the binding obligations of the county, according to their import.

In the adoption of said resolution providing for the issue of such refunding bonds, the board of county commissioners shall make the principal of the debt payable in equal annual installments during the currency of the period, not exceeding twenty-five years, within which the debt is to be discharged; but the date of maturity of the first installment of the debt shall be not more than five years from the date of said refunding bonds.

Source:

L. 17:

p. 155, § 3.

C.L.

§ 8867.

CSA:

C. 45, § 219.

CRS 53:

§ 36-7-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-7-3.

30-26-404. Disposition of bonds - outstanding canceled.

All such refunding bonds may be exchanged, dollar for dollar, for the bonds to be refunded, or they may be sold at not less than their par value, as directed by the board of county commissioners, and the proceeds thereof shall be applied only to the purpose for which such refunding bonds were issued. Such refunding bonds shall not be issued until the outstanding bonds to be refunded have been called in and canceled in an amount equal to or in excess of the bonds so issued, and all accrued interest on any such bonds to be refunded shall be paid before such refunding bonds are issued.

Source:

L. 17:

p. 156, § 4.

C.L.

§ 8868.

CSA:

C. 45, § 220.

CRS 53:

§ 36-7-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-7-4.

30-26-405. Interest - how paid - redemption fund.

The interest accruing on such refunding bonds issued pursuant to the provisions of this part 4 prior to the time when tax levies are available therefor shall be paid out of the general revenues of the county, and, for the purpose of reimbursing such general revenues and for the payment of subsequently accruing interest, the board of county commissioners issuing such refunding bonds or the proper tax-assessing and tax-collecting officers upon whom shall devolve the duty of levying and collecting county taxes shall levy annually a sufficient tax upon all the taxable property in the county fully to discharge such interest, and, for the ultimate redemption of such refunding bonds, they shall levy annually such a tax upon all the taxable property in such county as will create a fund sufficient to discharge each annual installment of such refunding bonds at the maturity thereof, which fund shall be called the redemption fund. All taxes for interest on and for the redemption of such bonds shall be paid in cash only and shall be kept by the county treasurer as a special fund to be used only in payment of the interest upon and for the redemption of such bonds, and such tax shall be levied and collected as other county taxes are levied and collected. The tax provisions for the ultimate redemption of such bonds shall be set forth in the resolution authorizing their issue and shall set forth the years in which such taxes shall be levied for the creation of said redemption fund.

Source:

L. 17:

p. 156, § 5.

C.L.

§ 8869.

CSA:

C. 45, § 221.

CRS 53:

§ 36-7-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-7-5.

30-26-406. No repeal or alteration of resolution.

Any resolution authorizing an issue of refunding bonds under the provisions of this part 4 and providing for the levy of taxes for the payment of the interest upon and the principal of such refunding bonds shall not be altered or repealed until the indebtedness thereby authorized has been fully paid.

Source:

L. 17:

p. 157, § 6.

C.L.

§ 8870.

CSA:

C. 45, § 222.

CRS 53:

§ 36-7-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-7-6.